Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 27. Regional Tourist Promotion Councils

§ 57-27-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings, unless the context hereof clearly indicates otherwise:

“Regional tourist promotion council” shall mean a corporation organized pursuant to the provisions of the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Law established for the purposes authorized in this chapter, and which is recognized by the Mississippi Board of Economic Development as qualifying under the provisions of this chapter.

“Board” shall mean the Mississippi Board of Economic Development or any successor agency that may be designated by law to succeed to the duties of the Mississippi Board of Economic Development with respect to the promotion of tourist travel and vacation business in Mississippi.

“Natural promotion regions” shall consist of the following area tourist councils:

Area Tourist Council One: DeSoto, Tate, Panola, Yalobusha, Grenada, Calhoun, Lafayette, Marshall, Benton, Union, Pontotoc, Tippah, Alcorn, Tishomingo, Prentiss, Lee and Itawamba.

Area Tourist Council Two: Tunica, Coahoma, Quitman, Bolivar, Tallahatchie, Sunflower, Leflore, Carroll, Washington, Humphreys, Holmes, Issaquena and Sharkey.

Area Tourist Council Three: Chichasaw, Monroe, Montgomery, Webster, Clay, Choctaw, Oktibbeha, Lowndes, Attala, Winston, Noxubee, Leake, Neshoba, Kemper, Scott, Newton, Lauderdale, Smith, Jasper and Clarke.

Area Tourist Council Four: Warren, Yazoo, Madison, Hinds, Rankin, Claiborne, Copiah, Simpson, Jefferson, Adams, Franklin, Lincoln, Lawrence, Wilkinson, Amite, Pike and Walthall.

Area Tourist Council Five: Jefferson Davis, Covington, Jones, Wayne, Marion, Lamar, Forrest, Perry, Greene, Pearl River, Stone, George, Hancock, Harrison and Jackson.

Upon the approval of the Mississippi Board of Economic Development, the area tourist councils established by subsection (c) may reorganize in order to allow a county to join that council with which it feels most closely connected, taking into consideration such factors as common interests and compatibility with the member counties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 307; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 15, eff from and after February 1, 1980.

§ 57-27-3.
Organization of nonprofit corporation; application for recognition as regional council; inclusion of county in adjacent natural region.

Any group of interested citizens and residents of counties comprising a natural promotion region of this state, and who are residents of counties representing not less than fifty percent (50%) of the total population of the region, but in no event less than fifteen (15) individuals, who shall form a nonprofit corporation pursuant to the provisions of the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Law for the purpose of promoting tourist travel and vacation business in the counties comprising the natural promotion region, and whose charter, bylaws and purpose are in compliance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, may apply for recognition by the board as a regional tourist promotion council under this chapter. Provided, that upon approval of the board, a county in one (1) natural promotion region of the state may be included within the area comprising a different and adjacent natural promotion region if, and when, experience establishes that the county tourist values are more closely identified with the other region.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 16, eff from and after February 1, 1980.

§ 57-27-5.
Designation and certification of nonprofit corporation as regional council; revocation or suspension of designation.

The board, upon receipt of a copy of incorporation papers, constitution, bylaws and resolutions, if any, of a nonprofit corporation applying for recognition as a regional tourist promotion council under the provisions of this chapter is hereby authorized to designate such corporation as a regional tourist promotion council whenever the board shall determine:

that the applying agency is established under the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Law, and has a constitution and bylaws governing the activities and purposes of said corporation which are in compliance with the rules and regulations of the board;

that the charter, constitution or bylaws of the applying council provide for the selection of a board of directors, and successor members on said boards, of persons who have demonstrated knowledge of and interest in the tourist travel and vacation business in the various counties comprising the council to be served by the agency;

that the applying council has furnished a proposed plan and demonstration of financial resources to establish and promote an active tourist travel and vacation business promotion program within the region.

Upon determining that an applying corporation is eligible for designation as a regional tourist promotion council, the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board shall upon a majority vote of said board designate such council as the participating council for such region and shall certify same to the applying council. The board is hereby authorized to revoke or suspend its designation of any regional tourist promotion council whenever the board shall determine that said council is not complying with the rules and regulations of the board, or has failed to comply with the terms of any grant made to such council pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 57-27-7.
State matching grants; contents of application; limitation on amount.

The travel and tourism department of the board is hereby authorized, upon approval of the board, to make grants, from funds specifically appropriated for such purposes, to regional tourist promotion councils to assist such councils in the financing of promotional and advertising programs and to encourage and stimulate tourist travel and vacation business within the region. Provided, that before any such grant may be made, the regional tourist promotional council shall have made application to the board for such grant, and shall have set forth therein the promotion and advertising program and project, or projects, proposed to be undertaken for the purpose of encouraging and stimulating the tourist travel and vacation business within the region. The application shall further state, under oath or affirmation, the amount of funds held by or committed or subscribed to the regional tourist promotion council for application to the purposes herein described and the amount of the grant for which application is made.

The board, after review of the application, if satisfied that the program of the regional tourist promotion council appears to be in accord with the purposes of this chapter, shall authorize the making of a matching grant to such regional tourist promotion council equal to the funds of the council allocated by it to the program described in the application; provided, however, that the state grant shall not exceed an amount equal to the total amount apportioned to the region as outlined herein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 57-27-9.
Acceptance of gifts, grants or donations by council; review and allocation of state matching funds.

The board and/or regional tourist promotion council are hereby authorized to accept gifts, grants or donations from the federal government or agencies thereof, and from private individuals, foundations or concerns to be used in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

The board shall annually review the amount of funds appropriated by the Mississippi Legislature, and other funds that may be available therefor, and shall apportion said funds to various participating regional tourist promotion councils for grant purposes on the following basis: Twenty percent (20%) shall be apportioned to each of the five (5) congressional districts. If, at the end of a six (6) month period, an area has not applied for the full amount allocated to it, the money shall be reallocated to the other areas during the last six (6) months of the fiscal year for use in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 57-27-11.
Purposes for which matched funds may be expended.

At least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total matching funds of any participating regional tourist promotion council shall be first used in the production, preparation and printing of a regional tourist promotion brochure, and the participating council shall thereafter allocate such funds, as may be designated by the board, for the revision, reproduction and printing of such regional promotion brochure as the board may designate. The balance of matched funds available to each regional tourist promotion council may be used for needed approved tourist promotion, advertising or research programs designated to encourage and stimulate the visitor and vacation business within the region as may have been approved by the board.

No part of the matched funds provided by the participating council, or made available on a matching basis by the board, may be used by a regional tourist promotion council for administrative salaries or expenses, it being the intent hereof that all matched funds shall be used for the purposes for which the application and grant is made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 57-27-13.
Grants to be made on matching basis; notice of approval of application and payment of grant; investigations and audits.

All grants under the provisions of this chapter shall be on a matching basis with the applying council furnishing fifty percent (50%) of the funds and the state grants in no event exceeding an amount equal to the funds supplied by the council. Upon approval of each application and the making of a grant by the board in accordance therewith, the board shall give notice to the applying regional tourist promotion council of such approval and grant, and shall direct the regional tourist promotion council to proceed with its promotional program as described in its application, and to use therefor funds allocated by the regional tourist promotion council for such purposes. Upon the furnishing of said evidence to the board that the particular regional tourist promotion council has proceeded in accordance with the terms of the application, the grant allocated to such agency shall be paid to the council by the board.

The board may, from time to time, make such investigations and audits, and require each participating council to furnish such evidence or proof, to determine that all funds granted under the provisions of this chapter are being handled and expended for the purposes as approved by the board in awarding the grant.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1973.

§ 57-27-15.
Designation of state agency to administer chapter.

The travel and tourism department of the board is hereby designated as the administrative agency of this state to act, under the authority of the board, in administering the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 390, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1973.